District of Columbia statutes.
29-1117

Membership interest not transferable.

Except as otherwise provided in the governing principles, a member’s interest or any right under the governing principles shall not be transferable.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 21 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).

Editor's Notes